Hawaii statutes.
§612-27 Rules. The supreme court is
authorized to adopt, amend, and repeal rules of court, not inconsistent with
the policies and objectives set forth in this chapter, regulating all aspects
of the selection and management of grand and trial jurors, and setting forth
policies, procedures, and forms for the selection and management of grand and
trial jurors in the jury pools, in courtrooms, and in other appropriate
circumstances in furtherance of the objectives of this chapter. [L 1987, c 366,
§2; am L 2007, c 122, §18]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next